en: Gymnastics Bars & Balance Beams
xx: Gymnastics Bars & Balance Beams
cs: Gymnastické hrazdy a kladiny
da: Gymnastikbarer og bomme
de: Turnstangen & Schwebebalken
es: Tablas de equilibrio y barras de gimnasia
fr: Poutres et barres de gymnastique
it: Sbarre da ginnastica e travi di equilibrio
ja: 体操用鉄棒・平均台
nl: Turn- en evenwichtsbalken
no: Svingstenger og balansebommer
pl: Drążki gimnastyczne i równoważnie
pt: Barras e traves para ginástica olímpica
ru: Гимнастические перекладины и бревна
sv: Gymnastikbarrer och balansbommar
tr: Jimnastik Çubukları ve Denge Direkleri

en: Gymnastics Protective Gear
xx: Gymnastics Protective Gear
cs: Gymnastické ochranné pomůcky
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til gymnastik
de: Schutzausrüstung
es: Equipo de protección para gimnasia
fr: Matériel de protection
it: Attrezzatura protettiva ginnastica
ja: 体操用プロテクター
nl: Beschermende uitrusting voor turnen
no: Beskyttelsesutstyr for turn
pl: Ochraniacze do gimnastyki
pt: Equipamento de proteção para ginástica
ru: Защитная экипировка для гимнастики
sv: Skyddsutrustning för gymnastik
tr: Jimnastik Koruyucu Giysileri

en: Gymnastics Grips
xx: Gymnastics Grips
cs: Gymnastická ochrana rukou
da: Gymnastikgreb
de: Turner-Handbandagen
es: Calleras para gimnasia
fr: Maniques de gymnastique
it: Paracalli da ginnastica
ja: 体操用ハンドプロテクター
nl: Turnleertjes
no: Håndlær til svingstang
pl: Uchwyty treningowe do gimnastyki artystycznej
pt: Estafas para ginástica
ru: Гимнастические захваты
sv: Grepphandskar för gymnastik
tr: Jimnastikçi Gripleri

en: Gymnastics Rings
xx: Gymnastics Rings
cs: Gymnastické kruhy
da: Gymnastikringe
de: Turnringe
es: Anillas de gimnasia
fr: Anneaux de gymnastique
it: Anelli da ginnastica
ja: 吊り輪
nl: Turnringen
no: Turnringer
pl: Kółka gimnastyczne
pt: Ringues de ginástica
ru: Гимнастические кольца
sv: Gymnastikringar
tr: Jimnastik Halkaları

en: Gymnastics Springboards
xx: Gymnastics Springboards
cs: Odrazové můstky na gymnastiku
da: Springbræt
de: Turnsprungbretter
es: Trampolines
fr: Tremplins de gymnastique
it: Pedane da salto
ja: 跳躍板
nl: Springplanken voor turnen
no: Springbrett til turn
pl: Odskocznie
pt: Trampolins de ginástica
ru: Гимнастические трамплины
sv: Satsbrädor
tr: Jimnastik Tramplenleri

en: Pommel Horses
xx: Pommel Horses
cs: Gymnastické koně
da: Gymnastikheste
de: Pauschenpferde
es: Caballo con arcos de gimnasia
fr: Chevaux d'arçons
it: Cavalli con maniglie
ja: 鞍馬
nl: Voltigepaarden
no: Bøylehester
pl: Konie gimnastyczne
pt: Cavalo com alças para ginástica
ru: Гимнастические кони
sv: Bygelhästar
tr: Atlama Beygirleri

en: Vaulting Horses
xx: Vaulting Horses
cs: Cvičební koně
da: Bukke
de: Sprungpferde
es: Potros
fr: Chevaux de saut
it: Cavalli
ja: 跳馬
nl: Springpaarden
no: Hester (turn)
pl: Woltyżerka
pt: Cavalo para ginástica
ru: Гимнастические снаряды для опорных прыжков
sv: Hopphästar
tr: Kulplu Beygirler

en: Racquetball & Squash
xx: Racquetball & Squash
cs: Raketbal a squash
da: Racquetball og squash
de: Racquetball & Squash
es: Ráquetbol y squash
fr: Racquetball et squash
it: Racquetball e squash
ja: スカッシュ・ラケットボール
nl: Racquetball en squash
no: Racquetball og squash
pl: Racquetball i squash
pt: Raquetebol e squash
ru: Ракетболл и сквош
sv: Racketboll och squash
tr: Racquetball ve Squash

en: Racquetball & Squash Balls
xx: Racquetball & Squash Balls
cs: Míče na raketbal a squash
da: Bolde til racquetball og squash
de: Racquetball- & Squash-Bälle
es: Pelotas de ráquetbol y squash
fr: Balles de racquetball et de squash
it: Palle da racquetball e da squash
ja: スカッシュ・ラケットボール用ボール
nl: Ballen voor racquetball en squash
no: Baller til racquetball og squash
pl: Piłki do racquetballa i squasha
pt: Bolas para raquetebol e squash
ru: Мячи для ракетболла и сквоша
sv: Bollar till racketboll och squash
tr: Racquetball ve Squash Topları

en: Racquetball & Squash Eyewear
xx: Racquetball & Squash Eyewear
cs: Brýle na squash a raketbal
da: Squash- og racquetballbriller
de: Squash- & Racquetball-Schutzbrillen
es: Lentes para ráquetbol y squash
fr: Lunettes de squash et de racquetball
it: Occhiali protettivi per squash/racquetball
ja: スカッシュ・ラケットボール用ゴーグル
nl: Squash- en racquetballbrillen
no: Briller til squash og racquetball
pl: Gogle do gry w squasha i raquetballa
pt: Óculos de proteção para jogos de raquetebol e squash
ru: Защитные очки для сквоша и ракетбола
sv: Skyddsglasögon för squash och racketboll
tr: Squash ve Raquetball Gözlüğü

en: Racquetball & Squash Gloves
xx: Racquetball & Squash Gloves
cs: Rukavice na squash a raketbal
da: Handsker til squash og racquetball
de: Squash- & Racquetball-Handschuhe
es: Guantes para squash y ráquetbol
fr: Gants de squash et de racquetball
it: Guanti da squash e racquetball
ja: スカッシュ・ラケットボール用グローブ
nl: Squash- en racquetballhandschoenen
no: Hansker til squash og racquetball
pl: Rękawice do gry w squasha i raquetballa
pt: Luvas de squash e raquetebol
ru: Перчатки для сквоша и рэкетбола
sv: Handskar för squash och racquetball
tr: Squash ve Racquetball Eldivenleri

en: Racquetball Racquets
xx: Racquetball Racquets
cs: Rakety na raketbal
da: Racquetballketsjere
de: Racquetball-Schläger
es: Raquetas de ráquetbol
fr: Raquettes de racquetball
it: Racchette per racquetball
ja: ラケットボール用ラケット
nl: Racquetballrackets
no: Racketer til racquetball
pl: Rakiety do raquetballa
pt: Raquetes para raquetebol
ru: Ракетки для ракетбола
sv: Racketbollracketar
tr: Racquetball Raketleri

en: Squash Racquets
xx: Squash Racquets
cs: Rakety na squash
da: Squashketsjere
de: Squashschläger
es: Raquetas de squash
fr: Raquettes de squash
it: Racchette da squash
ja: スカッシュラケット
nl: Squashrackets
no: Squashracketer
pl: Rakiety do squasha
pt: Raquetes para squash
ru: Ракетки для сквоша
sv: Squashracketar
tr: Squash Raketleri

en: Rounders
xx: Rounders
cs: Pálkovaná
da: Rundbold
de: Rounders
es: Rounders
fr: Rounders
it: Rounders
ja: ラウンダーズ用品
nl: Rounders
no: Rounders
pl: Palant
pt: Rounders
ru: Товары для английской лапты
sv: Rounders
tr: Rounders

en: Rounders Bats
xx: Rounders Bats
cs: Pálky na pálkovanou
da: Rundboldbat
de: Rounders-Schläger
es: Bates para rounders
fr: Battes de rounders
it: Mazze per rounders
ja: ラウンダーズ用バット
nl: Rounders-knuppels
no: Rounders-balltre
pl: Kije do gry rounders
pt: Tacos de rounders
ru: Биты для английской лапты
sv: Roundersslagträn
tr: Rounders Sopaları

en: Rounders Gloves
xx: Rounders Gloves
cs: Rukavice na pálkovanou
da: Rundboldhandsker
de: Rounders-Handschuhe
es: Guantes para rounders
fr: Gants de rounders
it: Guanti per rounders
ja: ラウンダーズ用グローブ
nl: Rounders-handschoenen
no: Rounders-hansker
pl: Rękawice do gry rounders
pt: Luvas de rounders
ru: Перчатки для английской лапты
sv: Roundershandskar
tr: Rounders Eldivenleri

en: Rugby
xx: Rugby
cs: Ragby
da: Rugby
de: Rugby
es: Rugby
fr: Rugby
it: Rugby
ja: ラグビー用品
nl: Rugby
no: Rugby
pl: Rugby
pt: Rúgbi
ru: Товары для регби
sv: Rugby
tr: Ragbi

en: Rugby Balls
xx: Rugby Balls
cs: Ragbyové míče
da: Rugbybolde
de: Rugby-Bälle
es: Balones de rugby
fr: Ballons de rugby
it: Palloni da rugby
ja: ラグビーボール
nl: Rugbyballen
no: Rugby-baller
pl: Piłki do rugby
pt: Bolas de rúgbi
ru: Мячи для регби
sv: Rugbybollar
tr: Ragbi Topları

en: Rugby Gloves
xx: Rugby Gloves
cs: Ragbyové rukavice
da: Rugbyhandsker
de: Rugby-Handschuhe
es: Guantes de rugby
fr: Gants de rugby
it: Guanti da rugby
ja: ラグビー用グローブ
nl: Rugbyhandschoenen
no: Rugby-hansker
pl: Rękawice do rugby
pt: Luvas de rúgbi
ru: Перчатки для регби
sv: Rugbyhandskar
tr: Ragbi Eldivenleri

en: Rugby Posts
xx: Rugby Posts
cs: Ragbyové branky
da: Rugbystænger
de: Rugby-Tore
es: Postes de rugby
fr: Poteaux de rugby
it: Pali da rugby
ja: ラグビーポスト
nl: Rugbypalen
no: Rugby-stolper
pl: Słupki do rugby
pt: Postes de rúgbi
ru: Стойки для регби
sv: Rugbystolpar
tr: Ragbi Kaleleri